Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-18] Mitigation of hazardous
situations. (a) Even in the absence of an emergency or disaster, the
governor may authorize designated state employees, agents, contractors, or
representatives to enter private property at reasonable times to mitigate
situations deemed by the governor to be hazardous to the health and safety of
the public; provided that this section shall be applicable only to the
following actions:

(1) Cutting, trimming, or removing dangerous trees or
branches that pose a hazard to other properties;

(2) Stabilizing or removing unstable rock and soil
hazards; or

(3) Cleaning streams and waterways to mitigate or
prevent flooding or other hazards;

provided further that at least ten days' written
notice shall be provided to the landowner and to the occupier of the private
property of the governor's intention to authorize designated state employees,
agents, contractors, or representatives to enter the property to mitigate the
hazardous situation; provided further that the landowner or occupier shall be
given a reasonable opportunity to mitigate the hazardous situation without
assistance of the State before designated state employees, agents, contractors,
or representatives may enter the property.

(b) Written notice sent to the landowner's
last known address by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt
requested, shall be deemed sufficient notice. If land ownership cannot be
determined, notice shall be given once in a daily or weekly publication of
general circulation in the county in which any action or proposed action will
be taken.

(c) If entry is refused, the governor may
apply to the district court in the circuit in which the property is located for
a warrant to enter the premises. The district court may issue a warrant directing
the chief of the appropriate county police to assist the governor in gaining
entry onto the premises during regular working hours or at other reasonable
times.

(d) The governor may seek recovery and
reimbursement, by appropriate proceedings, of all costs and expenses incurred
in the mitigation of a hazardous situation under this section, and any costs
and expenses imposed against any landowner shall be a lien upon the landowner's
property.

(e) This section shall take effect only upon
authorization and funding for personnel to administer the program. [L 2014, c
111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next